Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2221
Practical nursing; license; requirements.

An applicant for a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall submit satisfactory proof that the applicant has completed four years of high school study or its equivalent as determined by the board and has completed the basic curriculum in and holds a diploma from an approved program of nursing. There is no minimum age requirement for licensure as a licensed practical nurse.

Laws 1955, c. 272, § 8, p. 859;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 13;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 17;

Laws 1980, LB 847, § 19;

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 32;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 158;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 42;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 47;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,132.37;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 777.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.